Hawaii statutes.
§383-9 Agricultural labor.
"Agricultural labor" includes all service performed prior to
January 1, 1972, which was agricultural labor as defined in this section
prior to such date, and remunerated service performed after December 31,
1971:

(1) On a farm, in the employ of any person in
connection with cultivating the soil, or in connection with raising or
harvesting any agricultural or horticultural commodity, including the raising,
shearing, feeding, caring for, training, and management of livestock, bees,
poultry, and furbearing animals and wildlife;

(2) In the employ of the owner or tenant or other
operator of a farm, in connection with the operation, management, conservation,
improvement, or maintenance of such farm and its tools and equipment, or in
salvaging timber or clearing land of brush and other debris left by a
hurricane, if the major part of such service is performed on a farm;

(3) In connection with the production or harvesting
of any commodity defined as an agricultural commodity in section 15(g) of the
federal Agricultural Marketing Act, as amended, or in connection with the
ginning of cotton, or in connection with the operation or maintenance of
ditches, canals, reservoirs, or waterways, not owned or operated for profit,
used exclusively for supplying and storing water for farming purposes;

(4) (A) In the employ of the operator of a farm
in handling, planting, drying, packing, packaging, processing, freezing,
grading, storing, or delivering to storage or to market or to a carrier for
transportation to market, in its unmanufactured state, any agricultural or
horticultural commodity; but only if such operator produced more than one-half
of the commodity with respect to which such service is performed;

(B) In the employ of a group of operators of
farms (or a cooperative organization of which such operators are members) in
the performance of service described in subparagraph (A), but only if such
operators produced more than one-half of the commodity with respect to which
such service is performed;

(C) The provisions of subparagraphs (A) and
(B) shall not be deemed to be applicable with respect to service performed in
connection with commercial canning or commercial freezing or in connection with
any agricultural or horticultural commodity after its delivery to a terminal
market for distribution for consumption; or

(5) On a farm operated for profit if such service is
not in the course of the employer's trade or business.

As used in this section, "farm"
includes stock, dairy, poultry, fruit, furbearing animal, and truck farms,
plantations, ranches, nurseries, ranges, greenhouses, or other similar
structures used primarily for the raising of agricultural or horticultural
commodities, and orchards. [L 1941, c 304, §1, pt of subs 8; RL 1945, §4210; RL
1955, §93-9; HRS §383-9; am L 1971, c 187, §3; am L 1977, c 148, §3]

Case Notes

Arboretum is not a "farm" exempted from chapter
where ninety per cent of its revenues come from fees charged its visitors. 66
H. 388, 662 P.2d 1120 (1983).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next